Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.480

Confidential nature of information disclosed by interrogatories.

Interrogatories propounded by the secretary of state and the answers thereto shall not be open to public inspection, nor shall the secretary of state disclose any facts or information obtained therefrom unless (1) his or her official duty may require that the same be made public, or (2) such interrogatories or the answers thereto are required for use in evidence in any criminal proceedings or other action by the state.

[ 1982 c 35 s 158; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 96.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.